Utah statutes.
76-8-106.   Receiving bribe or bribery for endorsement of person as public servant.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if:

(1)  He solicits, accepts, agrees to accept for himself, another person, or a political party, money or any other pecuniary benefit as compensation for his endorsement, nomination, appointment, approval, or disapproval of any person for a position as a public servant or for the advancement of any public servant; or

(2)  He knowingly gives, offers, or promises any pecuniary benefit prohibited by paragraph (1).



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

